Utah statutes.
53B-4-103.   Commissioners -- Duties -- Records of academic progress -- Cancellation of student registration.

(1)  The commissioners are the three resident members from the state of Utah, required by Article IV of the compact, and are authorized to function as representatives of the state on the Western Interstate Commission for Higher Education.

(2)  The commissioners' duties are as follows:

(a)  to study the need for professional and graduate educational facilities not available within this state;

(b)  to recommend appropriations to meet the needs of this act;

(c)  to provide for screening of all applicants for professional, graduate, or higher educational study not available within the state in accordance with established rules; and

(d)  to certify to out of state institutions under the compact all acceptable candidates.

(3)  An applicant may not be certified unless the applicant has been a bona fide resident of the state for at least the five years prior to the date of application.

(4) (a)  Students must maintain continuous Utah residency during their attendance at an out of state institution in order to receive financial support under the compact.

(b)  If Utah residency is terminated by a student during any academic year in which the student has received financial support under the compact, the support shall be relinquished and terminated at the end of that academic year.

(5) (a)  The Commissioner of Higher Education shall maintain records of the academic progress of Utah students receiving financial support under the compact while attending out of state institutions.

(b)  If the records reveal a student is not progressing satisfactorily, upon recommendation of the out of state institution, the commissioner shall cancel the student's registration and withhold future payments otherwise due.

